Florida, session 2026, HB807.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (5) of section 318.14, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
318.14 Noncriminal traffic infractions; exception;
procedures.—
(5)(a) Any person electing to appear before the designated
official or who is required to appear shall be deemed to have
waived his or her right to the civil penalty provisions of s.
318.18. The official, after a hearing, shall make a
determination as to whether an infraction has been committed. If
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb807-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 807 2026
the commission of an infraction has been proven, the official
may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $500, except that in
cases involving unlawful speed in a school zone or involving
unlawful speed in a construction zone, the civil penalty may not
exceed $1,000; or require attendance at a driver improvement
school, or both.
(b)1. If the person is required to appear before the
designated official pursuant to s. 318.19(1) and is found to
have committed the infraction, the designated official shall
impose a civil penalty of $1,000 in addition to any other
penalties and the person's driver license shall be suspended for
6 months.
2. If the person is required to appear before the
designated official pursuant to s. 318.19(1) and is found to
have committed the infraction against a vulnerable road user as
defined in s. 316.027(1), the designated official shall impose a
civil penalty of not less than $5,000 in addition to any other
penalties, the person's driver license shall be suspended for 1
year, and the person shall be required to attend a department-
approved driver improvement course relating to the rights of
vulnerable road users relative to vehicles on the roadway as
provided in s. 322.0261(2).
(c)1. If the person is required to appear before the
designated official pursuant to s. 318.19(2) and is found to
have committed the infraction, the designated official shall
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb807-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 807 2026
impose a civil penalty of $500 in addition to any other
penalties and the person's driver license shall be suspended for
3 months.
2. If the person is required to appear before the
designated official pursuant to s. 318.19(2) and is found to
have committed the infraction against a vulnerable road user as
defined in s. 316.027(1), the designated official shall impose a
civil penalty of not less than $1,500 in addition to any other
penalties, the person's driver license shall be suspended for 3
months, and the person shall be required to attend a department-
approved driver improvement course relating to the rights of
vulnerable road users relative to vehicles on the roadway as
provided in s. 322.0261(2).
(d) If the person is required to appear before the
designated official pursuant to s. 318.19(7) and is found to
have committed an infraction of s. 316.075(1)(c) or s.
316.123(2):
1. Except as provided in subparagraphs 2. and 3., the
designated official shall impose a civil penalty of $500 in
addition to any other penalties.
2. A second time, the designated official shall impose a
civil penalty of $1,000 in addition to any other penalties and
the person's driver license shall be suspended for 6 months.
3. A third or subsequent time, the designated official
shall impose a civil penalty of $1,000 in addition to any other
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb807-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 807 2026
penalties and the person's driver license shall be suspended for
1 year.
(e) If the official determines that no infraction has been
committed, no costs or penalties shall be imposed and any costs
or penalties that have been paid shall be returned.
(f) Moneys received from the mandatory civil penalties
imposed pursuant to this subsection upon persons required to
appear before a designated official pursuant to s. 318.19(1), or
(2), or (7) shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue and
deposited into the Department of Health Emergency Medical
Services Trust Fund to provide financial support to certified
trauma centers to assure the availability and accessibility of
trauma services throughout the state. Funds deposited into the
Emergency Medical Services Trust Fund under this section shall
be allocated as follows:
1.(a) Fifty percent shall be allocated equally among all
Level I, Level II, and pediatric trauma centers in recognition
of readiness costs for maintaining trauma services.
2.(b) Fifty percent shall be allocated among Level I,
Level II, and pediatric trauma centers based on each center's
relative volume of trauma cases as calculated using the hospital
discharge data collected pursuant to s. 408.061.
Section 2. Subsections (5) and (6) of section 318.19,
Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection (7) is added to
100 that section, to read:
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb807-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 807 2026
101 318.19 Infractions requiring a mandatory hearing.—Any
102 person cited for the infractions listed in this section shall
103 not have the provisions of s. 318.14(2), (4), and (9) available
104 to him or her but must appear before the designated official at
105 the time and location of the scheduled hearing:
106 (5) Any infraction of s. 316.183(2), s. 316.187, or s.
107 316.189 of exceeding the speed limit by 30 mph or more; or
108 (6) Any infraction of s. 316.1926(2); or
109 (7) Any infraction of s. 316.075(1)(c) or s. 316.123(2)
110 which resulted in a crash with another vehicle as defined in s.
111 316.003.
112 Section 3. Section 324.023, Florida Statutes, is amended
113 to read:
114 324.023 Financial responsibility for bodily injury or
115 death.—
116 (1) In addition to any other financial responsibility
117 required by law, every owner or operator of a motor vehicle that
118 is required to be registered in this state, or that is located
119 within this state, and who:,
120 (a) Regardless of adjudication of guilt, has been found
121 guilty of or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a
122 charge of driving under the influence under s. 316.193 after
123 October 1, 2007; or
124 (b) Is found to have committed an infraction of s.
125 316.075(1)(c) or s. 316.123(2) which resulted in a crash with
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb807-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 807 2026
126 another vehicle as defined in s. 316.003,
127
128 shall, by one of the methods established in s. 324.031(1) or
129 (2), establish and maintain the ability to respond in damages
130 for liability on account of accidents arising out of the use of
131 a motor vehicle in the amount of $100,000 because of bodily
132 injury to, or death of, one person in any one crash and, subject
133 to such limits for one person, in the amount of $300,000 because
134 of bodily injury to, or death of, two or more persons in any one
135 crash and in the amount of $50,000 because of property damage in
136 any one crash. If the owner or operator chooses to establish and
137 maintain such ability by furnishing a certificate of deposit
138 pursuant to s. 324.031(2), such certificate of deposit must be
139 at least $350,000. An owner or operator convicted under
140 paragraph (a) must carry such higher limits must be carried for
141 at least a minimum period of 3 years. An owner or operator
142 convicted under paragraph (b) must carry such higher limits for
143 at least 1 year.
144 (2) If an the owner or operator convicted under paragraph
145 (1)(a) has not been convicted of driving under the influence or
146 a felony traffic offense for at least a period of 3 years after
147 from the date of reinstatement of driving privileges for a
148 violation of s. 316.193, the owner or operator is shall be
149 exempt from this section.
150 Section 4. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb807-00